Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Article 1. State Fiscal Officer.
§ 7-7-43.
Warrants not to be issued to state’s debtors; notice for state tax claim; liability for disregard of notice.

The State Fiscal Officer, any chancery or city clerk, or the fiscal officer of any county or separate school district, institution of higher learning, state college, university or state community college, shall not issue any warrant upon any allowance made to, or claim in favor of, any person, his agent, or assignee who shall be indebted to the state, or against whom there shall be any balance appearing in favor of the state; but such officer shall allow such debtor a credit on his account for such allowance or claim.

For state tax claims, the Tax Commissioner is required to furnish the appropriate fiscal officer with notice that state taxes have not been paid. This notice shall serve as a stop order upon any allowance made to, or claim in favor of, any person, his agent, or assignee who shall be indebted to the state, or any political subdivision thereof, or against whom there shall be any balance appearing in favor of the state or any political subdivision thereof. Disregard of the stop order notice shall create a personal liability against such fiscal officer for the full amount of state taxes due, plus interest and penalty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 22; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 112; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 21; Laws, 1993, ch. 563, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 7-7-45.
Financial reports.

The State Fiscal Officer shall be required to make the following reports:

The State Fiscal Officer shall, within sixty (60) days after the adjournment of the Legislature, prepare and furnish to the State Auditor a full statement of all moneys expended at such session, specifying the items and amount of each item, and to whom and for what paid, in order that the Auditor may publish the amounts of all appropriations, all as prescribed by Section 113 of the Constitution. Sufficient copies of the report shall be made available to members of the Legislature, state officials, departments, institutions and agencies of the state government, as may be requested by such individual or department; and such others are to be made available for distribution as the State Fiscal Officer or Governor may determine.

The State Fiscal Officer shall, within fifteen (15) days after the commencement of every regular session of the Legislature, make to it a special report on the fiscal affairs of the state as of January 1 of the then current year.

The State Fiscal Officer shall prepare the comprehensive annual financial report as provided for in Section 27-104-4.

In addition to the other reports herein required, it shall be the duty of the State Fiscal Officer to have available in the State Fiscal Officer’s office, for the use of the Governor, the Legislature, the Legislative Budget Office and any other persons, daily reports of each fund account which the State Fiscal Officer is required to maintain, showing thereon balances brought forward, receipts to date, net expenditures to date, the unexpended balances, the amount of unpaid purchase orders, and the unencumbered balances. In addition thereto, the State Fiscal Officer shall be required to have available in its office reports of appropriation accounts, showing thereon the amount appropriated for each purpose, the amount of warrants issued to date, the unexpended appropriation balance, the amount of unpaid purchase orders, and the unencumbered appropriation balance for each such account.

Nothing herein shall be construed as preventing the State Fiscal Officer from making such other financial reports, and at such other time as it may deem advisable or for the best interests of the state; nor shall this section be construed as authority for discontinuing any other reports required by law. The cost of printing such reports of the State Fiscal Officer, as required herein, shall be paid from the appropriation made for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-23; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 23; Laws, 1970, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 113; Laws, 1986, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-47.
Regulations and forms.

The State Fiscal Officer shall prescribe all regulations and shall prescribe uniform forms that he deems necessary for the performance of the duties required by Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-24; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 24; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 114; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-49.
Purpose and intent of Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65.

The purpose and intent of Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65 is hereby declared to be the establishment and maintenance of a modernized and efficient General Accounting Office for the State of Mississippi so that there may be available at all times therein all pertinent information of a fiscal nature concerning the operation of the state government. While the State Fiscal Officer is hereby charged with the primary responsibility of establishing and maintaining such office and making available the information contemplated herein, he is to work in conjunction with other state agencies, not injuring the normal functions thereof, in arriving at the desired end. Full cooperation and cohesive effort is hereby declared to be essential by and between the State Fiscal Officer, the State Treasurer, the Legislative Budget Office, the State Department of Audit, the State Tax Commission, and all other state departments, institutions and agencies, in order that the full purpose and intent of the cited sections may be effected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-25; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 25; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 115; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-51.
Procurement and installation of necessary machines and equipment.

The State Fiscal Officer is hereby given the authority, and it shall be his duty, to procure on competitive bids and install or have installed all machines, equipment, records and other things necessary for the performance of the duties imposed upon the State Fiscal Officer by Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65. Such machines and equipment as are to be purchased shall be purchased in full compliance with the laws of the state pertaining thereto and, if in the discretion of the State Fiscal Officer, it is to the best interests of the state, he may rent certain machines and equipment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-26; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 26; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 116; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-53.
Bureau of Capitol Facilities to provide office space.

It shall be the duty of the Bureau of Capitol Facilities, acting under the authority given by Section 29-5-3, to provide sufficient office space for the office of the State Fiscal Officer, including the amount required for filing and storage, although the space for the filing and storage of invoices, statements, bills, and other papers and documents of such nature, held for more than two (2) years after the date of issuance, may not be required to be furnished.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-27; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 27; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-55.
Accounts to be kept with counties, districts, and municipalities.

The State Fiscal Officer shall maintain accounts to show the name of every county, school district, municipality and every other district of any kind or character receiving funds from the state, in such manner that there may be ascertained therefrom the amounts of state funds appropriated or otherwise contributed thereto. Where reports are necessary from other departments of state government in order for the State Fiscal Officer to do this, the State Fiscal Officer may require such departments to make such reports in the manner and at the times he may prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-28; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 28; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 117; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-57.
Issuance of duplicate warrants.

Upon satisfactory proof being presented to the State Fiscal Officer that any warrant drawn by the State Fiscal Officer upon the State Treasury has been lost or destroyed before having been paid, the State Fiscal Officer may issue a duplicate therefor upon a bond being executed by the State Fiscal Officer with such security as is approved by him, payable to the state in the penalty of double the amount of the warrant, and conditioned to save harmless the state from any loss occasioned by the issuing of the duplicate warrant, together with an affidavit relating the circumstances under which said warrant was lost or destroyed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-29; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 29; Laws, 1966, ch. 556, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 118; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-59.
Petty cash funds.

A reasonable petty cash fund shall be allowed each state department, institution, board, commission or other agency if, in the judgment of the State Fiscal Officer, such is necessary for the proper operation of the fiscal affairs thereof. The amount of such petty cash fund shall be fixed by the State Fiscal Officer in each case, but these funds shall be reimbursed only upon vouchers audited by the State Fiscal Officer. It shall not be lawful for any petty cash fund to be used for cashing checks or otherwise advancing funds to any officer or employee of any state department or agency.

The State Fiscal Officer may by regulation provide for the establishment of commercial bank accounts by any state agency, which shall serve as the depository for self-generated funds and custodial funds not required by law to be deposited in the State Treasury. The regulations may provide for such accounts to be used for disbursements not required to be made by warrants on the State Treasury. Each such account established shall have a maximum balance to be fixed by the State Fiscal Officer. All such accounts shall bear interest. For self-generated funds, the interest shall be deposited in the General Fund and for custodial funds, the interest shall be deposited in the custodial bank account. The State Auditor shall test for compliance with this section in any postaudit, and may, after notice and hearing, levy a civil penalty not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for any violation hereof. The auditor shall annually report all violations of this section to the Governor and the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-30; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 30; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 119; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 13; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 8; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-60.
Petty cash funds for offices within county, municipality, or board of education.

A petty cash fund for offices within the county, municipality or board of education may be established in accordance with regulations set forth by the State Auditor’s office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 425, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1985).

§ 7-7-61.
Seal of the office.

The seal used by the State Fiscal Officer shall be the seal prescribed by Section 126 of the Mississippi Constitution. The seal is to be impressed, or printed, upon the face of every disbursement warrant issued by the State Fiscal Officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-31; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 31; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 120; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-63.
Preservation of books and records.

The State Fiscal Officer shall carefully keep and preserve the books, records, papers and other things belonging to the General Accounting Office. Invoices, statements, bills and other papers of such nature may be disposed of in accordance with approved records control schedules. No records, however, may be destroyed without the approval of the Director of the Department of Archives and History.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-32; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 32; Laws, 1981, ch. 501, § 17; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 121; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-65.
Books open for inspection.

The State Fiscal Officer shall submit the accounts and records of the General Accounting Office to the inspection of any member of the Legislature or the Governor when required.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-33; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 33; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 122; ch. 532, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-67.
Investigation of fiscal officers and depositories.

It shall be the duty of the state auditor to investigate the books, accounts, and vouchers of all fiscal officers and depositories of the state and of every county, levee board, and taxing district of every kind, and to sue for, collect, and pay over all money improperly withheld by such fiscal officer or depository. He has the power to sue and right of action against all such officers and depositories and their sureties to collect any such moneys; but if the delinquency appears by a correct open account on the books of the proper accounting officer or depository, the right of the state auditor to sue shall arise only after he has given thirty (30) days’ notice to the delinquent officer or depository to pay over the amounts and he fails to do so. If he shall examine the books, accounts, and vouchers of any fiscal officer or depository of the state, county, levee board, or taxing district of any kind and find them correct, he shall give a certificate to that effect to such officer and to the board of supervisors of the proper county, or to the proper levee board, or other taxing district.

The state auditor may, in his discretion, also investigate the books, accounts, and vouchers of any municipality, even though such investigation and inspection has been made by a certified public accountant or an accounting firm; and the state auditor shall have the same authority and powers regarding such municipal inspections as granted herein regarding any other investigation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-01; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-69.
Examination of records of various boards.

It shall be the further duty of the state auditor and he shall have the authority to examine the records, minutes, and allowances of the various boards of supervisors, drainage boards, and all other boards empowered to make allowances of public money under the laws of the state. He shall give notice to such boards of any errors in accounting, of funds credited to any erroneous account, and of funds in public treasuries to an erroneous account; and unless such board shall within thirty (30) days correct such errors or omissions, the members thereof shall be guilty of misfeasance of office and punished accordingly. Should the state auditor discover that any of the boards mentioned in the preceding parts of this section have appropriated any money to the purpose not authorized by law, he shall have authority to bring suit for the amount of such illegal allowance or allowances against the members of such board voting for such illegal allowance on their official bond and against the party receiving such allowance. In the event of recovery, he shall be entitled to recover the amount due, which shall be paid into the fund to which it is due; and he may assess a penalty thereon not to exceed twenty percent (20%), which shall be paid into the general fund in the state treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-02; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-71.
Examination of records of public officers.

The state auditor, in the discharge of the official duties imposed upon him by Sections 7-7-67 through 7-7-79, shall have full power and authority to examine and investigate the books, records, papers, accounts, and vouchers of any state, county, municipal, or other officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-73.
Embezzlement by public officer or employee.

When the state auditor shall have reason to believe that a public officer or employee has embezzled any public funds, he shall notify the governor and the proper district attorney, and shall attend the trial as a witness for the state, if necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-75.
Suits by state auditor.

All suits by the state auditor under the provisions of Sections 7-7-67 through 7-7-79 shall be in his own name for the use of the state, county, municipality, levee board, or other taxing district interested; and he shall not be liable for costs, and may appeal without bond. Such suits may be tried at the return term and shall take precedence over other suits.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-05; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-77.
Settlement and accounting for moneys collected.

The state auditor shall settle with the proper officers and pay over all moneys collected by him under the provisions of Sections 7-7-67 through 7-7-79 as required by law. He shall make a report to the state treasurer at the end of the fiscal year, giving a full account of all said collections by him during the preceding fiscal year, and of whom and on whose account collected. For a failure to render such account and settle and pay over all such collections made by him as required by law, the state auditor shall be suspended from office by the governor in the same manner as in the case of a defaulting state treasurer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-06; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-79.
Reports of operation.

The state auditor shall make a detailed account of the operation of Sections 7-7-67 through 7-7-79 to the governor once each year, and to the legislature at each regular session.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3867-07; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 7-7-81.
Audits of entities and their use of monies from certain federal
funds; Auditor’s Enhanced Accountability Fund created.

The State Auditor shall have the authority to preaudit or postaudit, conduct performance audits and reviews, investigate projects, entities and their use of any funds provided to the state or any of its agencies or subdivision, or any nonprofit organization, from the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, the federal RESTORE Act, the Gulf Environmental Benefit Fund, and fees derived from the Natural Resource Damage Assessment pursuant to the 2010 Deepwater Horizon explosion and oil spill, and their successors. If sufficient resources are available, the State Auditor shall maintain an official Web site and provide public access to copies of audit reports of state and local government entities receiving funds from the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act, the federal RESTORE Act, the Gulf Environmental Benefit Fund, and fees derived from the Natural Resource Damage Assessment pursuant to the 2010 Deepwater Horizon explosion and oil spill, and their successors. The State Auditor shall have the authority to recover costs associated with auditing and investigating such projects and funds within the limits of federal law from any such entity that receives such funds. In addition, the State Auditor shall have the authority to contract with qualified certified public accounting firms to perform selected engagements under this section, if funds are made available for such contracts by the Legislature, the governmental entities covered by this section or by the federal government. All files, working papers, notes, correspondence and any other data compiled by the audit firms in connection with the engagements shall be available upon request, without cost, to the State Auditor for examination and abstracting during the normal business hours of any business day.

A special fund, to be designated as the “Auditor’s Enhanced Accountability Fund,” shall be created within the State Treasury. The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state. Within the limits of federal law, initial funds shall be deposited from each governing entity receiving monies from the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act, the federal RESTORE Act, the Gulf Environmental Benefit Fund, and fees derived from the Natural Resource Damage Assessment pursuant to the 2010 Deepwater Horizon explosion and oil spill, based on a sliding scale to be determined by the State Auditor. Subsequent and additional funds may be deposited from any source made available to the Department of Audit for such purposes. Unexpended monies from the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act, the federal RESTORE Act, the Gulf Environmental Benefit Fund, and fees derived from the Natural Resource Damage Assessment pursuant to the 2010 Deepwater Horizon explosion and oil spill, remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund, but shall be held to pay for postaudit and investigative costs for related expenditures and programs. Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the State Auditor, to pay the allowable costs of additional preaudit, postaudit, investigative, or other allowable or accountability requirements not funded through regular appropriations or special fund billing provided in this section. Monies in the special fund may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the State Auditor to accomplish objectives under this section. The State Auditor shall maintain a specific accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought and shall provide a report to the Legislature within sixty (60) days from the end of each fiscal year regarding the nature and amounts of all expenditures. The Department of Audit may escalate its budget and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 22; Laws, 2014, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.